Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 3 Justices of Supreme, Superior, and Family Courts
8-3-16.
Retirement contribution.

Judges engaged after December 31, 1989, shall have deducted from total salary beginning December 31, 1989, and ending June 30, 2012, an amount equal to a rate percent of compensation as specified in §

36-10-1

relating to member contributions to the state retirement system. Effective July 1, 2012, all active judges, whether engaged before or after December 31, 1989, shall have deducted from compensation as defined in subsection

36-8-1(8)

an amount equal to twelve percent (12%) of compensation, except active Supreme Court Judges as of June 30, 2012, who shall have deducted from compensation as defined in section

36-8-1(8)

an amount equal to the percent of compensation in effect on June 30, 2012. Proceeds deposited shall be held in trust for the purpose of paying retirement benefits to participating judges or their beneficiaries on the date contributions are withheld but no later than three (3) business days following the pay period ending in which contributions were withheld. The retirement board shall establish rules and regulations to govern the provisions of this section.

The state is required to deduct and withhold member contributions and to transmit same to the retirement system and is hereby made liable for the contribution. In addition, any amount of employee contributions actually deducted and withheld shall be deemed to be a special fund in trust for the benefit of the member and shall be transmitted to the retirement system as set forth herein.

A member of the judiciary who withdraws from service or ceases to be a member for any reason other than retirement, shall be paid on demand a refund consisting of the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in his or her individual account in the judicial retirement benefits account. Any member receiving a refund shall thereby forfeit and relinquish all accrued rights as a member of the system together with credits for total service previously granted to the member; provided, however, that if any member who has received a refund shall subsequently reenter the service and again become a member of the system, he or she shall have the privilege of restoring all money previously received or disbursed to his or her credit as refund of contributions plus regular interest for the period from the date of refund to the date of restoration. Upon the repayment of the refund as herein provided, the member shall again receive credit for the amount of total service which he or she had previously forfeited by the acceptance of the refund.

Whenever any judge dies from any cause before retirement and has no surviving spouse, domestic partner, or minor child(ren), a payment shall be made of the accumulated contributions standing to his or her credit in his or her individual account in the judicial retirement benefits account. The payment of the accumulated contributions of the judge shall be made to such person as the judge shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the retirement board, or if the judge has filed no nomination, or if the person so nominated has died, then to the estate of the deceased judge.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 118, art. 15, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 129, art. 22, § 2; P.L. 1989, ch. 494, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 507, § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 37; P.L. 2007, ch. 167, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 15; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 15; P.L. 2019, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 271, § 1.

8-3-17.
State contributions.

The state of Rhode Island shall make its contribution for the maintaining of the system established by §

8-3-16

and providing the annuities, benefits, and retirement allowances in accordance with the provisions of this chapter by annually appropriating an amount that will pay a rate percent of the compensation paid after December 31, 1989, to judges engaged after December 31, 1989. The rate percent shall be computed and certified in accordance with the procedures set forth in §§

36-8-13

and

36-10-2

under rules and regulations promulgated by the retirement board pursuant to §

36-8-3

. The amounts that would have been contributed shall be deposited in a special fund and not used for any purpose on the date contributions are withheld but no later than three (3) business days following the pay period ending in which contributions were withheld.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 494, § 2; P.L. 1990, ch. 507, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 10, § 4; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 10; P.L. 2010, ch. 9, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 10, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 15; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 15; P.L. 2019, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 271, § 1.

8-3-18.
Calculation of retirement benefits.

For purposes of the calculation of retirement benefits, in the event that any justice or judge of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, or the district court participates or acquiesces in a state shutdown or in a reduced salary or a salary deferral plan consistent with any such plan imposed upon or agreed to by other state employees, his or her annual salary shall be calculated as if he or she had not participated or acquiesced in any such shutdown or plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 1991, ch. 129, § 4; P.L. 1991 ch. 174, § 4.

8-3-19.
Domestic partner — Definition.

For purposes of this chapter, “domestic partner” shall be defined as a person who, prior to the decedent’s death, was in an exclusive, intimate and committed relationship with the decedent, and who certifies by affidavit that their relationship met the following qualifications:

Both partners were at least eighteen (18) years of age and were mentally competent to contract;

Neither partner was married to anyone else;

Partners were not related by blood to a degree which would prohibit marriage in the state of Rhode Island;

Partners resided together and had resided together for at least one year at the time of death; and

Partners were financially interdependent as evidenced by at least two (2) of the following:

Domestic partnership agreement or relationship contract;

Joint mortgage or joint ownership of primary residence;

Two (2) of: (A) joint ownership of motor vehicle; (B) joint checking account; (C) joint credit account; (D) joint lease; and/or

The domestic partner had been designated as a beneficiary for the decedent’s will, retirement contract or life insurance.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 2.

8-3-20.
Severability.

The holding of any section or sections or parts of this chapter to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional for any cause shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part hereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 15; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 15.